Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 6 Employment of Women and Children

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

48A Am. Jur. 2d Labor and Labor Relations §§ 2653 to 2671.

§§ 27-6-101 through 27-6-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 8, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1901, ch. 33, § 1, 2, Laws 1923, ch. 62, § 1, 3, 4, 6, and Laws 1937, ch. 30, § 1, related to employment of women and children.

§ 27-6-107.
Children; proof of age required; prohibited employment.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to employ, permit or allow any child under the age of fourteen (14) years to work at any gainful occupation except farm, domestic or lawn and yard service. To ensure that a child is of proper age to be employed under this section, every person, firm or corporation employing a child under sixteen (16) years of age shall procure and have on file where the child is employed, a form of proof of age as required under W.S.

27-6-108

; provided however that under no circumstances shall any child under sixteen (16) years of age be employed in any occupation listed in W.S.

27-6-112

or in any occupation declared by the department of workforce services to be hazardous for children under sixteen (16) years of age.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 48, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 20-305; C.S. 1945, § 58-304; W.S. 1957, § 27-225; Laws 1963, ch. 181, § 7; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1997, ch. 182, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” near the end.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lawn mowing by minors as violation of child labor statutes, 56 ALR3d 1166.

§ 27-6-108.
Children; proof of age required; inspection and form.

The proof of age required by W.S.

27-6-107

shall be made available for inspection by any official charged with the enforcement of laws regulating the employment of minors. The acceptable forms of proof of age include the following:

A duly attested birth certificate;

A properly prepared immigration and naturalization form I-9 showing the age of the child; or

Any other document showing the age of the child as approved by the department of workforce services.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 182, § 2.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 48, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 20-306; C.S. 1945, § 58-305; W.S. 1957, § 27-226; Laws 1963, ch. 181, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1997, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a)(iii).

§ 27-6-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 182, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1923, ch. 48, § 6, related to enforcement of laws regulating the employment of minors.

§ 27-6-110.
Children; hours of labor.

No child under sixteen (16) years of age shall be employed, permitted or suffered to work at any gainful occupation except farm or domestic service, for more than eight (8) hours in any twelve (12) hour period, or before the hour of five (5:00) o’clock a.m. or after the hour of ten (10:00) o’clock p.m. on nights followed by a school day, or after the hour of twelve (12:00) midnight on days which are not followed by a school day.

Provided however that children between the ages of fourteen (14) and sixteen (16) years who are not enrolled in school may be employed at any gainful occupation for an eight (8) hour period between the hours of five (5:00) a.m. and twelve (12:00) midnight of any one (1) day.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 77, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 3881; Laws 1923, ch. 48, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 20-304; C.S. 1945, § 58-303; W.S. 1957, § 27-228; Laws 1963, ch. 181, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to hours of labor generally, see chapter 5 of this title.

§ 27-6-111.
Children; employment during school prohibited.

No child under the age of sixteen (16) who is enrolled in any private or public school in the state of Wyoming shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work at any occupation or service during the time that the classes of said school in which the said child is enrolled are in session.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 48, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 20-301; C.S. 1945, § 58-301; W.S. 1957, § 27-229; Laws 1963, ch. 181, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to compulsory attendance of children, see §§

21-4-101

through

21-4-107

.

§ 27-6-112.
Children; prohibition of employment in certain occupations.

No child under sixteen (16) years of age shall be employed, permitted, or allowed to work at, in, or in connection with any of the following occupations, or at any of the following kinds of work except for the purpose of instruction in the public schools:

The operation of or working on heavy construction equipment;

Employment requiring contact with or exposure to explosives or dangerous chemicals; or in any other occupation declared by the department of workforce services as hazardous, for the employment of children under sixteen (16) years of age.

The department of workforce services is hereby authorized to declare any occupation hazardous for the employment of children under sixteen (16) years of age.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 77, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3880; Laws 1923, ch. 48, § 2; 1925, ch. 11, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 20-303; C.S. 1945, § 58-302; W.S. 1957, § 27-230; Laws 1959, ch. 133, § 1; 1963, ch. 181, § 5; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1997, ch. 182, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a)(ii) and (b).

Where employment lawful, worker's compensation sole remedy.—

Where neither this section nor §

27-6-107

of the child labor statutes made the work in which the minor was engaged at the time of his death an unlawful or illegal employment, the provisions of the Workmen's Compensation Law (now Worker's Compensation Act) were the only remedy available to the minor's personal representative. Hart v. Blair, 378 P.2d 677,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1963) (decided prior to the 1963 amendments to this section and §

27-6-107

).

Although federal law may have prohibited the type of employment sixteen-year-old was engaged in when injured, he was a “legally employed minor” under Wyoming law, and therefore worker's compensation provided his exclusive remedy. Maser v. L. & H. Welding & Mach. Co., 1 P.3d 642,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 27-6-113.
Children; penalty for violations.

Any person employing any child or children in violation of the provisions of this chapter, or any child, subject hereto, who willfully and intentionally violates the provisions of this chapter, or any person who permits a violation, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than one hundred (100) days, or both.

Nothing in this chapter applies to or prevents a child under fourteen (14) years of age to be employed in a nonhazardous occupation outside of school hours by his parents, grandparents or legal guardian, or by a business owned by his parents, grandparents or legal guardian.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 48, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 20-308; C.S. 1945, § 58-307; W.S. 1957, § 27-231; Laws 1963, ch. 181, § 6; 1997, ch. 182, § 1; 2019 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "chapter" for "act" throughout; in (a), substituted "is guilty" for "shall be deemed guilty," "punished by a fine of" for "fined," "imprisonment for" for "or imprisoned in the county jail," and deleted "in the discretion of the court" at the end.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 8, ch. 48, Laws 1923, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 27-6-114.
Employment of children under 16 in amusement, immoral or dangerous pursuits forbidden; exceptions.

It is unlawful for any person having the care, custody or control of any child under the age of sixteen (16) years to:

Exhibit, use or employ that child:

As an actor or performer in any concert hall or room where alcoholic liquors and malt beverages are sold or given away except as provided in subsection (b) of this section;

For any illegal or immoral purpose;

For any business or in any place, situation, exhibition or vocation injurious to the morals, health or safety of the child.

Cause, procure or encourage a child to engage in any practice specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection.

Nothing in this section applies to or prevents:

The employment or use of any child as:

A singer or musician in any church, school or academy;

A dishwasher, busboy or delivery person in a place where alcoholic liquors and malt beverages are sold.

The teaching or learning of the science or practice of music;

The physical development of a child’s body in any respectable gymnasium or natatorium;

Children from taking part in amateur entertainments or theatricals for charity, or not for profit, in schools, churches, settlement houses or boys’ or girls’ clubs.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 77, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3879; R.S. 1931, § 20-302; C.S. 1945, § 58-308; W.S. 1957, § 27-232.

Cross references. —

As to unlawful selling of liquor to minor, see §§

12-5-502

and

12-6-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes or ordinances regulating sexual performance by child, 42 ALR5th 291.

§ 27-6-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 8, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1915, ch. 77, § 5, related to seats for girls.

§ 27-6-116.
Penalties for violations of certain provisions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 77, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 3883; R.S. 1931, § 20-310; C.S. 1945, § 58-310; W.S. 1957, § 27-234; repealed by 2019 ch. 137, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.